Utah statutes.
10-8-63.   Burial of dead -- Vital statistics.

They may regulate the burial of the dead, consistent with Title 8, Chapter 5, Municipal Cemeteries, the registration of births and deaths, direct the returning and keeping of bills of mortality, and impose penalties on physicians, sextons, and others for any default therein.

